Hawaii statutes.
§521-74.5 Recovery of possession limited.
The landlord shall not recover or take possession of a dwelling unit by the
wilful interruption or diminution of running water, hot water, or electric,
gas, or other essential service to the tenant contrary to the rental agreement
or section 521-42, except in case of abandonment or surrender. A landlord who
engages in this act shall be deemed to have engaged in an unfair method of
competition or unfair and deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any
trade or commerce within the meaning of section 480-2; provided that in
addition to the penalties available under section 480-3.1, there shall also be
minimum damages of three times the monthly rent or $1,000, whichever is
greater. [L 1987, c 125, §1; am L 1990, c 34, §33]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next